Missouri, session 2026, HB3321.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 182.711, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 182.711, to read as follows:
182.711. 1. The fiscal year for each urban public library district shall be July first to
June thirtieth unless otherwise set by the board of trustees, and each year the librarian shall
submit to the board of trustees a budget for the forthcoming fiscal year. The board of trustees
shall approve the budget after making any changes therein that it deems necessary. The
budget shall be approved on or before [June thirtieth] the last day of the fiscal year
preceding the fiscal year for which the budget was prepared. The board of trustees on its own
motion or at the request of the librarian, from time to time, may amend or modify the
approved budget. A copy of the approved budget shall be filed with the state auditor.
2. The treasurer of the board of trustees of an urban public library district shall
receive and be the custodian of all money belonging to the district from whatever source
derived. All funds of the urban public library district derived from local taxation to be used
for normal operations of the district shall be kept in a library operating fund. All funds
belonging to the district which are to be used for building purposes shall be kept in a library
building fund; all funds derived from state aid or federal grants, other than land, building and
furnishing grants, shall be kept in the library operating fund; and the board of trustees may
establish any other funds that it deems necessary. The treasurer shall deposit all moneys
belonging to the urban public library district in the depositaries that are selected by the board
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3321 2
of trustees. The treasurer shall also be the custodian of all bonds or other securities belonging
to the urban public library district.
3. Urban public library district moneys shall be disbursed by the treasurer by
appropriate instrument of payment only upon due authorization of the board of trustees and
duly certified for payment by the president. The certification shall specify the amount to be
paid, to whom payment is to be made and the purpose for which payment is being made. The
board of trustees by resolution may direct that the signature of the president or treasurer be a
facsimile signature in the manner provided by sections 105.272 to 105.278.
4. No authorization or certification shall be made, and no instrument of payment shall
be issued for the payment of any urban public library district indebtedness unless there is
sufficient money in the treasury and the proper fund for the payment of the indebtedness and
the indebtedness is in the proper form.
5. The treasurer of the board of trustees shall submit to the board of trustees, at each
regularly scheduled meeting thereof, an accounting reflecting receipt and disbursement of
funds belonging to the urban public library district.
✔